District of Columbia statutes.
2-829

Reference to “Mayor”.

Whenever the term “Mayor” is used in this chapter, such term will be deemed to refer to the Mayor of the District of Columbia.

Aug. 6, 1956, ch. 974, § 10
Jan. 30, 1968, 82 Stat. 4, Pub. L. 90-251, § 4
This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to the District of Columbia Council and to a Commissioner of the District of Columbia. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.
1973 Ed., § 1-1211.
1981 Ed., § 1-1809.